Tennessee, session 114, HB1350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-21-106, is amended by deleting
subsection (h) and substituting instead:
(h)
(1) A veteran who qualifies for issuance of a registration and license
plate issued free to disabled veterans under the authority of § 55-4-256 may, in
lieu of issuance of that plate, apply to be issued free a distinguishing placard for
disabled veterans.
(2) A veteran who has applied for and been issued a registration and
license plate issued free to disabled veterans under the authority of § 55-4-256
may apply to also be issued a distinguishing placard for disabled veterans upon
payment of the cost of the placard, which must be the same as the regular fee for
passenger motor vehicles, as provided in § 55-4-111.
(3) The distinguishing placard for disabled veterans issued under this
subsection (h) may be used in lieu of any distinguishing license plate for parking
purposes when displayed in accordance with the directions written on or supplied
with the placard. The department may establish procedures for the issuance of
the disabled veteran placards.
HB1350
001764
- 1 -

(i) As used in this section, "certificate" includes registration and license plates
issued free to disabled veterans under the authority of § 55-4-256, and distinguishing
placards issued to disabled veterans under subsection (h).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001764